Utah statutes.
78B-15-808.   Gestational agreement -- Miscellaneous provisions.
(1)  A gestational agreement may provide for payment of consideration.
(2)  A gestational agreement may not limit the right of the gestational mother
to make decisions to safeguard her health or that of the embryo or fetus.
(3)  After the issuance of an order under this part, subsequent marriage of
the gestational mother does not affect the validity of a gestational
agreement, and her husband's consent to the agreement is not required, nor is
her husband a presumed father of the resulting child.
